Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 6. Administration.

§ 55.1-2247.
General powers and duties of Board.

The Board may adopt, amend, and repeal rules and regulations and issue orders consistent with and in furtherance of the objectives of this chapter. The Board may prescribe forms and procedures for submitting information to the Board.

The Board may accept grants in aid from any governmental source and may contract with agencies charged with similar functions in this or other jurisdictions, in furtherance of the objectives of this chapter.

The Board may cooperate with agencies performing similar functions in this and other jurisdictions to develop uniform filing procedures and forms, uniform disclosure standards, and uniform administrative practices and may develop information that may be useful in the discharge of the Board’s duties.

The Board may issue an order requiring the developer or reseller to cease and desist from the unlawful practice and to take such affirmative action as in the judgment of the Board will carry out the purposes of this chapter if it determines after legal notice and opportunity for hearing that a developer or reseller or an agent of a developer or reseller has:
D. 1. The Board may issue an order requiring the developer or reseller to cease and desist from the unlawful practice and to take such affirmative action as in the judgment of the Board will carry out the purposes of this chapter if it determines after legal notice and opportunity for hearing that a developer or reseller or an agent of a developer or reseller has:

Made any representation in any document or information filed with the Board that is false or misleading;

Engaged or is engaging in any unlawful act or practice;

Disseminated or caused to be disseminated orally, or in writing, any false or misleading promotional materials in connection with a time-share program;

Concealed, diverted, or disposed of any funds or assets of any person in a manner impairing rights of purchasers of time-shares in the time-share program;

Failed to perform any stipulation or agreement made to induce the Board to issue an order relating to that time-share program;

Otherwise violated any provision of this chapter or any of the Board’s rules and regulations or orders; or

Disposed of any time-share in a time-share program without first complying with the requirements of this chapter.

The Board may also issue a cease and desist order if the developer has not registered the time-share program as required by this chapter or if a reseller has not registered as required by this chapter.

The Board, after notice and hearing, may issue an order revoking the registration of the developer’s time-share program or the registration of a reseller upon determination that such developer, reseller, or agent of such developer or reseller has failed to comply with a cease and desist order issued by the Board affecting the developer’s time-share program or the reseller.

If it appears that any person has engaged, is engaging, or is about to engage in any act or practice in violation of this chapter or any of the Board’s rules, regulations, or orders applicable to this chapter, the Board, without prior administrative proceedings, may bring an action in the circuit court of the county or city in which any portion of the time-share project is located to enjoin that act or practice or for other appropriate relief. The Board is not required to post a bond or prove that no adequate remedy at law exists.

Upon request of a time-share owner, the Board shall, in accordance with subsection B of §

55.1-2230

, issue its determination whether compliance with §

55.1-2220

or

55.1-2234

has occurred.

2.

If the Board makes a finding of fact in writing that the public interest will be irreparably harmed by delay in issuing an order, as prescribed in subdivision 1, it may issue a temporary order to cease and desist or to take such affirmative action as may be deemed appropriate by the agency. Prior to issuing the temporary order, the Board shall give notice of the proposal to issue a temporary order to the developer or the reseller. Every temporary order shall include in its terms:

a.

A provision clearly stating the reasons for issuing such order and the nature and extent of the facts and findings on which the order is based;

b.

A provision that a failure to comply with such temporary order will be a violation of this chapter; and

c.

A provision that upon request a hearing will be held promptly to determine whether or not the order shall become permanent.The Board shall not issue more than one temporary order with reference to such finding of fact as prescribed in this subsection.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-396; 1985, c. 517; 1998, c. 460; 2008, c. 376; 2011, c. 605; 2012, c. 751; 2019, cc. 467, 499, 712; 2020, c. 1011.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 467 amended § 55-396 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in subdivision D 2 by substituting “temporary order to cease and desist or to take such affirmative action as may be deemed appropriate by the agency” for “temporary cease and desist order” in the first sentence and “order” for “cease and desist order” in the last two sentences and subdivisions D 2 a, D 2 b, and in the first sentence in D 2 d.

Acts 2019, c. 499 amended § 55-396 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect by rewriting subdivision D 2.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1011 substituted “time-share program” for “project” in subdivision D 1 g.

§ 55.1-2248.
Cancellation of cease and desist order; reinstatement of registration of developer.

The Board shall stipulate to the developer or reseller the reason for any cease and desist order, or revocation of registration as outlined in §

55.1-2247

, by no later than the time such order or revocation is to become effective.

Should the developer or reseller satisfy the Board that it has corrected the reasons for the cease and desist order or revocation of registration, then the Board shall promptly cancel such order or reinstate the registration, and thereafter the developer or reseller may continue its offering or disposition of time-shares.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-397; 2012, c. 751; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2249.
Board regulation of public offering statement.

The Board may at any time require a developer to alter or supplement the form or substance of a public offering statement to assure adequate and accurate disclosure to prospective purchasers.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-398; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2250.
Proceedings and investigations.

All proceedings of the Board under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

The Board may make necessary public or private investigations within or outside the Commonwealth to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant to this chapter.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-399; 2009, c. 557; 2011, c. 605; 2019, cc. 499, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 499 amended § 55-399 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect by rewriting the section.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2251.
Repealed by Acts 2019, c. 499, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 499, cl. 2 repealed § 55-399.1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 repeal has been given effect in this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Former § 55-399.1, pertaining to proceedings before the board, derived from 1985, c. 517; 2009, c. 557.

§ 55.1-2252.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of §

55.1-2217

,

55.1-2218

,

55.1-2219

,

55.1-2220

,

55.1-2221

,

55.1-2229

,

55.1-2233

, or

55.1-2238

, or any order issued pursuant to §§

55.1-2247

through

55.1-2250

is guilty of a Class 5 felony.Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of §

55.1-2226

,

55.1-2228

, or

55.1-2244

or any order issued pursuant to §§

55.1-2247

through

55.1-2250

regarding a violation of §

55.1-2226

,

55.1-2228

, or

55.1-2244

is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.Each violation shall be deemed a separate offense.

Any developer, member, agent or affiliate of any developer of time-shares registered pursuant to §

55.1-2241

, or any reseller, who violates any provision of this chapter or regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and who is not criminally prosecuted, may be subject to a civil penalty. If it has been determined by the Board upon or after a hearing that a respondent has violated this chapter or the Board’s rules and regulations, the Board shall proceed to determine the amount of the civil penalty for such violation, which shall not exceed $2,000 for each violation. Such penalty may be sued for and recovered in the name of the Commonwealth.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-400; 1983, c. 59; 1985, c. 517; 1991, c. 704; 2012, c. 751; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.